Hawaii statutes.
§286-303 Application for
identification card. (a) Application for the identification card shall be
made in person by any adult or minor. The minimum age for minors to obtain an
identification card shall be ten years of age. In the case of a minor under
the age of fourteen years, the application shall be made on the minor's behalf
by the parent, or by another individual in loco parentis of the minor who can
provide proof of guardianship. In the case of an incompetent individual, the
application shall be made by the individual having the custody or control of or
maintaining the incompetent individual.

(b) Application for renewal of an
identification card issued after November 1, 1998, for an individual eighty
years of age or older may be done by mailing in a completed application and
fee, if there is no change in name and citizenship status. The director shall
adopt rules to allow for renewal by mail for individuals with physical or
intellectual disabilities for whom application in person presents a serious
burden.

(c) Every application for an identification
card or duplicate of an identification card shall be made on a form developed
by the director and furnished by the examiner of drivers, signed by the
applicant, and signed by the applicant's parent or guardian if the applicant is
under eighteen years of age. The application shall contain the following
information:

(1) Name and complete address, including the number
and street name, of the applicant's permanent residence;

(2) The applicant's occupation and any pertinent data
relating thereto;

(3) The applicant's citizenship status;

(4) The applicant's veteran status if applicable and
desired by the applicant;

(5) The applicant's date and place of birth;

(6) General description of the applicant, including
the applicant's gender, height, weight, hair color, and eye color;

(7) The applicant's left and right index fingerprints
or, if clear impressions cannot be obtained, other identifying imprints as
specified by rules of the director;

(8) The social security number of the applicant; and

(9) A digitized frontal photograph of the applicant's
full face.

Each applicant shall present documentary evidence as
required by the examiner of drivers of the applicant's age and identity, and
the applicant shall swear or affirm that all information given is true and
correct.

(d) The application also shall state whether
the applicant has an advance health-care directive. If the applicant has an
advance health-care directive, the identification card shall bear the
designation "AHCD".

(e) The examiner of drivers, in accordance
with section 11-15, at the time of application, shall make available an
application for voter registration to every applicant for an identification
card who is eligible to register to vote.

(f) The examiner of drivers shall maintain a
suitable, indexed record of all applications.

(g) For the purpose of this section, "AHCD",
which stands for "advance health-care directive", means an individual
instruction in writing, a living will, or a durable power of attorney for
health care decisions. [L 2012, c 310, pt of §2; am L 2014, c 6, §3]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next